Illinois, session 104th, HB2131.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Section 30-41 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/30-41)7    Sec. 30-41. Notwithstanding any provision of this Act to 8the the contrary, the township board of trustees may make 9contracts relating to insurance. In no event shall the 10duration of the contract exceed the board term by more than one 11year. The township board of trustees shall include in the 12township's annual appropriation for each fiscal year an 13appropriation of a sum of money sufficient to pay the amount 14which, by the terms of the contract, is to become due and 15payable during the current fiscal year.16(Source: Incorporates P.A. 88-356; 88-670, eff. 12-2-94.)